Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.062

Stay of judgment—When prohibited—Credit for jail time pending appeal.

(1) Notwithstanding CrR 3.2 or RAP 7.2, an appeal by a defendant in a criminal action shall not stay the execution of the judgment of conviction, if the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(a) The defendant is likely to flee or to pose a danger to the safety of any other person or the community if the judgment is stayed; or

(b) The delay resulting from the stay will unduly diminish the deterrent effect of the punishment; or

(c) A stay of the judgment will cause unreasonable trauma to the victims of the crime or their families; or

(d) The defendant has not undertaken to the extent of the defendant's financial ability to pay the financial obligations under the judgment or has not posted an adequate performance bond to assure payment.

(2) An appeal by a defendant convicted of one of the following offenses shall not stay execution of the judgment of conviction: Rape in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.44.040 and 9A.44.050); rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree (RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079); child molestation in the first, second, or third degree (RCW 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, and 9A.44.089); sexual misconduct with a minor in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.44.093 and 9A.44.096); indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100); incest (RCW 9A.64.020); luring (RCW 9A.40.090); human trafficking in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); any class A or B felony that is a sexually motivated offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; a felony violation of RCW 9.68A.090; or any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit one of those offenses.

(3) In case the defendant has been convicted of a felony, and has been unable to obtain release pending the appeal by posting an appeal bond, cash, adequate security, release on personal recognizance, or any other conditions imposed by the court, the time the defendant has been imprisoned pending the appeal shall be deducted from the term for which the defendant was sentenced, if the judgment is affirmed.

[ 2011 c 111 s 3; 1996 c 275 s 9; 1989 c 276 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 4 s 1; 1969 c 103 s 1; 1955 c 42 s 2. Prior: 1893 c 61 s 30; RRS s 1745. Formerly RCW 10.73.030, part.]

NOTES:

Finding—1996 c 275: See note following RCW 9.94A.505.

Severability—1989 c 276: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 c 276 s 6.]